Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.400

Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program—Definition.

As used in RCW 28A.300.390 through 28A.300.415, "program" means the *Washington civil liberties public education program, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

[ 2000 c 210 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "Washington civil liberties public education program" was renamed the "Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program" pursuant to 2014 c 46 s 1.